Utah statutes.
62A-6-104.   Emergency -- Medical necessity.

If an emergency situation exists that prevents compliance with Section 62A-6-102 or 62A-6-103 because of medical necessity, if delay in performing the sterilization could result in serious physical injury or death to the person, the attending physician shall certify, in writing, the specific medical reasons that necessitated suspension of those requirements.  That certified statement shall become a permanent part of the sterilized person's medical record.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

